Hawaii statutes.
§281-22 Political activities of commission
employees. (a) A commission employee may support, advocate, or aid in the
election or defeat of any candidate for public office, or run for public
office; provided the employee:

(1) Notifies the commission in writing of the
employee's intent to support, advocate, or aid in the election or defeat of a
candidate for public office; and

(2) If a candidate for public office, takes a leave
of absence in accordance with section 78-23 for a period beginning prior to the
initiation of political activities related to the candidacy and ending the day
following the general election for the office.

(b) Notwithstanding chapter 11 or any other
law to the contrary, no commission employee shall solicit or receive
contributions, or receive or transfer money or anything of value from a
licensee for the purpose of supporting, advocating, or aiding in the election
or defeat of a candidate for public office. Violation of this subsection shall
be:

(1) Punishable by summary dismissal of the employee;
and

(2) Subject to fines in accordance with section
11-410. [L 2002, c 111, §1; am L 2009, c 184, §5; am L 2010, c 211, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next